Hawaii statutes.
§669-6 Disclaimer, default, no costs.
If in the action the defendant disclaims in the defendant's answer any interest
or estate in the property or suffers judgment to be taken against the defendant
without answer, the plaintiff shall not recover costs. [L 1890, c 18, §4; RL
1925, §2760; RL 1935, §4393; RL 1945, §10454; RL 1955, §242-4; HRS §669-6; gen
ch 1985]

Case Notes

Prior to Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure.

General denial, not a disclaimer. 14 H. 189. That each of
several defendants disclaims as to some of the land does not warrant dismissal
of action. 18 H. 494.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next